Louisiana, session 2026, SB478.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3134, 3452, and 3454(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§3134. Financial Accountability accountability in higher education; legislative
intent; definitions; reporting forms uniform fiscal policy;
administrative reporting; early warning metrics; corrective
actions
Page 1 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1415 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 478
A.(1) It is the intent of the legislature that an to establish and implement
comprehensive financial accountability process be established and implemented to
provide for the systematic, ongoing evaluation of quality and effectiveness in the
framework for public institutions of higher education in Louisiana that may be used
to initiate curriculum, programmatic, funding, policy, or planning changes in higher
education that provides for the systematic and ongoing evaluation of fiscal
health, operational efficiency, and institutional effectiveness.
(2) It is further the intent of the legislature that the such accountability
process monitor performance at the institutional level in each of the major areas of
research, student learning and development, faculty development and quality, and
to assure that progress toward providing excellent educational programming and
opportunities consistent with the institutional role, scope, and mission of each of the
public institutions of higher education is being made and funded framework include
the continuous monitoring and evaluation of institutional fiscal performance,
including the budgeting, allocation, expenditure, and stewardship of public
funds at the institutional level. The framework shall ensure that public funds
are expended in a manner that demonstrates efficiency, effectiveness, and
measurable return on investment, and that funding decisions are directly tied
to the achievement of defined performance outcomes consistent with the role,
scope, and mission of each public institution of higher education.
B.(1) The accountability process shall be developed by the Board of Regents
in a collaborative effort involving each higher education management board shall
establish a uniform fiscal policy including an institutional cash balance policy,
to be adopted by each public postsecondary education management board no
later than December 31, 2026.
(2) The policy shall require each public postsecondary education
institution to submit an institutional quarterly financial report to its respective
public postsecondary education management board.
(3) Each institutional quarterly financial report shall include, at a
Page 2 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1415 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 478
minimum:
(a) Quarterly revenues and expenditures, including comparisons to
budgeted amounts.
(b) Fund balances, including unrestricted, restricted, athletics, and
auxiliary funds.
(c) Cash flow and liquidity metrics.
(d) Outstanding debt obligations and material changes thereto.
(e) Actual and quarterly projected tuition and fee revenue.
(f) Account receivable balances.
(g) Identification of actual or projected deficits or financial risks.
(h) Campus action plans as needed.
(i) Any additional information as required by the Board of Regents.
(4) Institutional quarterly financial reports shall be submitted to the
management board no later than fifteen days after the close of each fiscal
quarter. Management boards shall submit compiled reports to the Board of
Regents no later than thirty days after the close of each fiscal quarter.
(5) Each management board shall review and compile such institutional
quarterly financial reports and submit a system level quarterly financial report,
inclusive of all institutions under its jurisdiction, to the Board of Regents.
Systems shall identify institutions in financial distress and must provide a
corrective action plan and a timeline to address the fiscal challenges of the
distressed institution.
(6) Each management board shall adopt policies to ensure timely and
accurate submission of reports required pursuant to this Section.
(7) Failure to timely submit required reports shall result in a designation
of noncompliance. The Board of Regents shall provide written notice of such
noncompliance to the commissioner of administration, the president of the
Senate, the speaker of the House of Representatives, the House Committee on
Appropriations, and the Senate Committee on Finance.
Page 3 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1415 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 478
C.(1) The Board of Regents shall develop and implement a fiscal early
warning system to monitor the financial condition of each public postsecondary
education institution. be the authorized agency for administration, implementation,
monitoring, and evaluation of the accountability process and is authorized to, but is
not limited to, the following:
(a) Adopt the appropriate measures, necessary standard definitions, and
program guidelines to implement an accountability process for public institutions of
higher education.
(b) Identify institutional and systemwide performance standards and
performance goals.
(c) Develop appropriate reporting procedures and formats for use by the
institutions in reporting data.
(d) Develop a process for allocating funding in an objective and measurable
manner designed to assure adequate resources are available to achieve excellent
educational programming and opportunity consistent with each institution's role,
scope, and mission and to provide incentive and reward for excellence in institutional
performance.
(e) Submit an annual report to the governor and to the Committees on
Education of the Senate and the House of Representatives beginning in 1997.
(2) The Board of Regents shall adopt such rules and regulations as may be
necessary in implementing this Section, which shall include but shall not be limited
to the final recommendations of the Accountability in Public Higher Education
Advisory Committee The warning system shall utilize the quarterly financial
reports submitted pursuant to this Section, together with any additional data
such as system internal audit reports required by the Board of Regents, to
identify conditions of financial distress, structural deficit, and risk of financial
insolvency at the earliest practicable stage.
(3) The Board of Regents shall establish uniform financial metrics and
risk indicators, including but not limited to:
Page 4 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1415 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 478
(a) Structural deficits exceeding three percent of an institution's
operating budget.
(b) Declines in cash on hand below two months of operating expenses.
(c) Negative cash flow.
(d) Increasing debt burden or unsustainable debt service ratios.
(e) Enrollment declines materially affecting revenue.
(f) Increasing accounts receivable balance.
D.(1) The Board of Regents may require that every public higher education
institution submit to it, at a time it specifies, an annual accountability report of
institutional effectiveness to include the data as it may determine shall require each
management board to develop and implement a detailed corrective action plan
in response to an institution identified as being in fiscal distress. The corrective
action plan should be submitted to the Board of Regents within ninety days of
the institution being deemed in distress to ensure timely and effective fiduciary
and budgetary measures.
(2) If a management board fails to take corrective action as required
pursuant to this Subsection, the Board of Regents shall refer the matter to the
office of inspector general for review.
E.(1) The provisions of this Section shall be mandatory only to the extent that
the necessary funds are appropriated to the Board of Regents for this purpose The
Louisiana Board of Regents shall annually submit a written report to the House
Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Finance, and the
Division of Administration not later than sixty days prior to the beginning of the
legislative session.
(2) The report shall include information provided for in Paragraphs
(B)(3) and (D)(1) of this Section.
* * *
§3452. Louisiana Universities Marine Consortium for Research and Education;
creation; membership
Page 5 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1415 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 478
The Louisiana Universities Marine Consortium for Research and Education,
referred to hereinafter as the consortium, is hereby created as a body corporate under
the authority of the Board of Regents Supervisors of Louisiana State University
and Agricultural and Mechanical College hereafter to be referred to as the board
in this Chapter.
* * *
§3454. Louisiana Universities Marine Consortium for Research and Education;
governance, funding
A. The Louisiana Universities Marine Consortium for Research and
Education shall be subject to the governance of the Board of Regents Supervisors
of Louisiana State University and Agricultural and Mechanical College. The
board shall serve as fiscal agent for the consortium and shall review and approve the
consortium's budgetary request and operating budget and shall review and approve
all funds appropriately awarded or bequeathed to the consortium. All funds
appropriated to the consortium shall be appropriated as a separate line item within
the appropriation of the Board of Regents Supervisors of Louisiana State
University and Agricultural and Mechanical College.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 17:3128.1 and 3168 are hereby repealed.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.